Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB745.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2702 of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2702. Residents.* * *(a.1) Nonresidents.--Any person shall for the purposes of this chapter be considered a resident of this Commonwealth if the person:(1) is not a resident of this Commonwealth;(2) has paid property taxes in this Commonwealth within the current or prior licensing season; and(3) establishes identity and proof of payment of the property taxes to the satisfaction of the commission.* * *123456789101112131415161718 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0745PN0771 - 2 - 1